District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.05

Vacancies.

When a vacancy develops on the Commission, the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council of the District of Columbia may appoint a successor to fill the unexpired portion of the term. A member may continue to serve beyond the expiration date of the member’s term until a successor is duly qualified. If within 30 calendar days of development of a vacancy on the Commission the Mayor fails to transmit to the Council of the District of Columbia a nomination for that vacancy, the Council of the District of Columbia may make the appointment. If within 60 calendar days of submission of a nomination for the Commission the Council of the District of Columbia fails to act, the nomination shall be deemed confirmed.

History

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 405, 22 DCR 2461
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law § 7-152, § 2, 35 DCR 5704

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2225.
1973 Ed., § 6-1725.